Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 2. Provisions Relating to Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children

§ 5921.
Financial responsibility.

Financial responsibility for any child placed pursuant to the provisions of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of Article V.
However, in the event of partial or complete default of performance thereunder, the provisions of this title and Title 15 also may be invoked.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 5922.
Appropriate public authorities.

The “appropriate public authorities” as used in Article II of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children shall, with reference to this State, mean the Department for Children and Families, and the Department shall receive and act with reference to notices required by Article III.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. April 5, 1972; amended

1973, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 26, eff. April 14, 1974;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 78, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 5923.
Commissioner for Children and Families.

As used in subsection (a) of Article V of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, the phrase “appropriate authority in the receiving state” with reference to this State shall mean the Commissioner for Children and Families.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. April 5, 1972; amended

1973, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. April 14, 1974;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 79, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 5924.
Agreements.

The officers and agencies of this State having authority to place children are hereby empowered to enter into agreements with appropriate officers or agencies of or in other party states pursuant to subsection (b) of Article V of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.
Any such agreement which contains a financial commitment or imposes a financial obligation on this State or agency thereof shall not be binding unless it has the approval in writing of the Secretary of the Agency of Administration.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 5925.
Placement of delinquent children.

The officers and agencies of this State having authority to place delinquent children may place such a child in an institution or in another state pursuant to Article VI of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children and shall retain jurisdiction as provided in Article V thereof.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 5926.
Placement of neglected or unmanageable children.

The officers and agencies of this State having authority to place neglected or unmanageable children may place such a child in another state.
However, unless parental rights have been judicially terminated any such child being placed in another state pursuant to this compact shall, upon request, be given a court hearing on notice to the parent or guardian with opportunity to be heard prior to his or her being sent to such other state for care and the court finds that:

equivalent facilities for the child are not available in this State;

care in the other state is in the best interest of the child and will not produce undue hardship.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. April 5, 1972.

§ 5927.
Executive head.

As used in Article VII of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, the term “executive head” means the Secretary of the Agency of Human Services. The Secretary of the Agency of Human Services is hereby authorized to appoint a compact administrator in accordance with the terms of said Article VII.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. April 5, 1972.